Connecticut, session 2026, HB05261.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Any municipality, as
2 defined in section 7-148 of the general statutes, may, by vote of its
3 legislative body, adopt an ordinance to prohibit rent increases for any
4 dwelling units, as defined in section 47a-1 of the general statutes, that
5 are subject to two or more violations of the ordinances of the
6 municipality relating to health and safety or the State Building Code,
7 until such violations are remedied.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
HSG Joint Favorable
HB5261 / File No. 108 1

HB5261 File No. 108
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Precludes None See Below
Grand List
Growth
Explanation
The bill may preclude grand list growth in various municipalities
beginning in FY 28 by limiting certain rental increases. This may limit
an increase in value for rental properties that are valued using the
income capitalization method.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and the number of impacted
properties.
HB5261 / File No. 108 2

HB5261 File No. 108
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5261
AN ACT PERMITTING MUNICIPALITIES TO PROHIBIT RENT
INCREASES IN THE EVENT OF MULTIPLE STATE BUILDING CODE
VIOLATIONS.